Illinois, session 104th, HB4483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-116.5 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-116.5)7    Sec. 6-116.5. Driver's duty to report medical condition. 8Every driver shall report to the Secretary any medical 9condition, as defined by the Driver's License Medical Review 10Law of 1992, that is likely to cause loss of consciousness or 11any loss of ability to safely operate a motor vehicle within 10 12days of the driver becoming aware of the condition. The 13Secretary, in conjunction with the Driver's License Medical 14Advisory Board, shall determine by administrative rule the 15temporary conditions not required to be reported under the 16provisions of this Section. If a person causes a fatality 17while operating a motor vehicle and it is determined that the 18fatality was caused entirely by the medical condition of the 19person, the Secretary of State shall suspend the person's 20driver's license until the person provides medical 21documentation that the medical condition is being treated. All 22information furnished to the Secretary under the provisions of 23this Section shall be deemed confidential and for the   HB4483- 2 -LRB104 15918 LNS 29149 b1privileged use of the Secretary in accordance with the 2provisions of subsection (j) of Section 2-123 of this Code.3(Source: P.A. 89-584, eff. 7-31-96.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.